Massachusetts, session 194th, S2171.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
the following section:-
Section 63
(a )Title This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Municipal Efficiency and
Regionalization Act."
(b) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to establish the Office of Municipal Efficiency and
Regionalization (OMER) to promote cost-effective governance, foster collaboration among
municipalities, and improve the delivery of public services through regionalization and shared
resource strategies.
(c ) Definitions: As used in this chapter the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
of 3

"Office" refers to the Office of Municipal Efficiency and Regionalization.
"Regionalization" refers to the process by which two or more municipalities collaborate
to provide shared services or resources to enhance efficiency and effectiveness.
"Municipality" refers to any city, town, or local government entity within the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
(d) Establishment of the Office (i) The Office of Municipal Efficiency and
Regionalization is hereby established within the Administration and Finance. (ii) The Office
shall be headed by a Director, appointed by the Governor, who has expertise in municipal
management, public administration, or related fields.
(e) Powers and Duties of the Office The Office shall have the following powers and
duties: (i) Provide technical assistance and guidance to municipalities on efficiency
improvements and regionalization opportunities. (ii) Administer grants and financial incentives
to support regionalization projects and shared services initiatives. (iii) Conduct studies and
develop reports identifying best practices for municipal efficiency and regional collaboration.
(iv) Facilitate inter-municipal agreements and partnerships to achieve economies of scale. (v)
Offer training programs for municipal officials and employees on topics related to efficiency,
regionalization, and resource optimization. (vi) Evaluate the financial and operational impacts of
proposed regionalization initiatives and provide recommendations. (vii) Monitor and report on
the progress and outcomes of regionalization efforts funded by the Office.
(f) Funding (i) The Office shall be funded through an annual appropriation by the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts. (i) The Office shall administer the dedicated grant fund,
“Efficiency & Regionalization grant program.”
of 3

(g) Reporting Requirements (i) The Office shall submit an annual report to the Governor
and the Legislature detailing its activities, funding allocations, and the outcomes of supported
projects. (ii) The report shall include recommendations for further legislative or administrative
actions to promote municipal efficiency and regionalization.
SECTION 2.
(a )Effective date This act shall take effect upon its passage. (i) The Governor shall
appoint the Director within 90 days of the act’s passage. (ii) The Office shall commence
operations within 180 days of the act’s passage.
(b) Severability If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application.
of 3